Colorado, session 2026A, SB171.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal as added by
Senate Bill 26-016 25-15-329.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 30-20-125 as
follows:
30-20-125. Preproduction plastic materials - disposal
requirements - definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "PREPRODUCTION PLASTIC MATERIALS" HAS THE MEANING SET
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

FORTH IN SECTION 25-8-1102 (3).
(2) A PERSON SHALL NOT DISPOSE OF PREPRODUCTION PLASTIC
MATERIALS AT A LOCATION THAT HAS NOT BEEN ISSUED A CERTIFICATE OF
DESIGNATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 30-20-105.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect August 12, 2027; except that, if a referendum petition is filed
pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this act
or an item, section, or part of this act within the ninety-day period after final
adjournment of the general assembly, then the act, item, section, or part will
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-171

not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect August 12, 2027.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-171